Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Department  of Corrections, for the biennium
beginning July 1,  2019, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for the following
purposes:
(1) Operations and health
services ................................. $1,190,464,967
(2) Central administration
and administrative
services ................................. $ 183,504,119
(3) Offender management
and rehabilitation.................. $ 76,859,930
(4) Community corrections ......... $ 289,280,640
(5) Debt service .......................... $ 116,080,590
(6) Capital improvements ........... $ 2,931,801
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the  Department of Cor-
rections, for the following purposes:
(1) Operations and health
services ................................. $ 18,894,264
(2) Central administration
and administrative
services ................................. $ 11,129,192
(3) Offender management
and rehabilitation.................. $ 10,209,756
(4) Community corrections ......... $ 2,667,196
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$4,533,582 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit  for
Enrolled Senate Bill 5504 (SB 5504-A) Page 1
payment of expenses from federal funds collected or received  by the Department of Cor-
rections.
SECTION 4. For the  biennium beginning July 1, 2019, expenditures by the Department
of Corrections from federal funds for debt service on Build America Bonds are not limited.
SECTION 5. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
Passed by Senate June 29, 2019
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 29, 2019
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5504 (SB 5504-A) Page 2